Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Voluntary Dissolution

271B.14-010.
Dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date of its incorporation;

Either:

That none of the corporation’s shares has been issued; or

That the corporation has not commenced business;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 137, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.14-020.
Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with KRS

271B.7-050

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (3)) of this section require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the proposal to dissolve to be adopted shall be approved by a majority of all votes entitled to be cast on that proposal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 138, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension. 83 A.L.R.3d 458.

271B.14-030.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing an original and three (3) exact or conformed copies of articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date dissolution was authorized;

If dissolution was approved by the shareholders:

The number of votes entitled to be cast on the proposal to dissolve; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for dissolution and a statement that the number cast for dissolution was sufficient for approval; and

If voting by voting groups was required, the information required by subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be separately provided for each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan to dissolve.

The Secretary of State shall immediately forward one (1) of the exact or conformed copies of the articles of dissolution to the secretary of revenue.

A corporation shall be dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 139, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.14-040.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty (120) days of its effective date.

Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless that authorization permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors (or incorporators) revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by subsection (1)(c) or (1)(d) of KRS

271B.14-030

.

Revocation of dissolution shall be effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it shall have the effect provided in KRS

14A.7-030

(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 140, effective January 1, 1989; 2012, ch. 81, § 94, effective July 12, 2012.

271B.14-050.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation shall continue its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities, including as appropriate, entering into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction thereof;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation shall not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Subtitle 8 of this chapter;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution;

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation;

Alter the obligations and responsibilities of the corporation as prescribed by applicable federal or state law with regard to the filing or examination of all federal and state tax returns or the payment, assessment, or collection of any federal or state tax due with respect to those returns; or

Abate or suspend KRS

271B.6-220

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
141, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
68, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
68, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 95, effective July 12, 2012.

271B.14-060.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice shall:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation shall be barred:

If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (2) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline;

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” shall not include a contingent liability, a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or any liability to the Commonwealth or the United States for any state or federal tax liability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 142, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.14-070.
Unknown claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants shall be barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under KRS

271B.14-060

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of his pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to him in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder’s total liability for all claims under this section shall not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 143, effective January 1, 1989.